Utah statutes.
11-14-304.5.   Recital in bonds -- Incontestability.

(1)  In the resolution authorizing bonds to be issued as provided in this chapter or other applicable law, a local political subdivision may require that the bonds recite that they are issued under authority of this chapter or other applicable law.

(2) (a)  A bond recital as provided in Subsection (1) conclusively establishes full compliance with all the provisions of applicable law.

(b)  All bonds issued containing a recital as provided in Subsection (1) shall be incontestable for any reason after their delivery for value.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 2006 General Session

